Arkansas, session 2025, SB457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-93-622, as amended by Section 2 of Acts
2025, No. 173, is amended to read as follows:
16-93-622. Parole or post-release supervision discharge for offenders
who are minors — Reinstatement of rights.
(a) The Post-Prison Transfer Board may discharge a person from parole
or post-release supervision if:
(1) The the person:
(A)(1) Was released on parole or post-release supervision
under § 16-93-621 or any provision of this chapter in which the person's
parole or post-release supervision term exceeds five (5) years, for having
committed an offense as a minor; and
(B)(2) Has served at least five (5) years on parole or
post-release supervision without a violation; and
*LJH183*
04-14-2025 13:54:09 LJH183

As Engrossed: H4/14/25 SB457
(2) The prosecuting attorney in the county where the person was
originally convicted has consented to the discharge of the person from parole
or post-release supervision.
(b) If the board decides to discharge a person under subsection (a) of
this section, the board shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the judicial
district where the person was convicted.
(c)(1) If the prosecuting attorney does not object to the board's
decision within sixty (60) days of notification under subsection (b) of this
section, the person shall be discharged from parole or post-release
supervision.
(2) If the prosecuting attorney objects to the board's decision
within sixty (60) days of notification under subsection (b) of this section,
the person shall not be discharged from parole or post-release supervision.
(b)(d) Unless otherwise provided by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment
51, a person who has been discharged from parole or post-release supervision
under subsection (a) of this section shall have his or her constitutional
right to vote restored.

/s/G. Leding

















04-14-2025 13:54:09 LJH183